Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-2214
Board members; additional qualifications.

(1) Each licensed practical nurse educator on the board shall (a) be a registered nurse currently licensed in the state, (b) have graduated with a graduate degree in nursing or a related field of study, (c) have had a minimum of five years' experience in administration, teaching, or consultation in practical nurse education, and (d) be currently employed as a practical nurse educator.

(2) Each associate degree or diploma nurse educator on the board and the baccalaureate nurse educator on the board shall (a) be a registered nurse currently licensed in the state, (b) have graduated with a graduate degree in nursing, (c) have had a minimum of five years' experience in administration, teaching, or consultation in nursing education, and (d) be currently employed in the field being represented.

(3) Each staff nurse on the board shall (a) be a registered nurse currently licensed in the state, (b) have had a minimum of five years' experience in nursing, and (c) be currently employed as a staff nurse in the provision of patient care services.

(4) Each nursing service administrator on the board shall (a) be a registered nurse currently licensed in the state, (b) have had a minimum of five years' experience in nursing service administration, and (c) be currently employed in such field.

(5) Each licensed practical nurse member shall (a) have completed at least four years of high school study, (b) be licensed as a licensed practical nurse in this state, (c) have obtained a certificate or diploma from a state-approved practical nursing program, (d) have been actively engaged in practical nursing for at least five years, and (e) be currently employed in the provision of patient care services as a licensed practical nurse in the state.

(6) Each public member shall meet the requirements of section 38-165.

(7)(a) Each advanced practice registered nurse on the board shall (i) have a minimum of five years' experience as an advanced practice registered nurse, (ii) be currently employed as an advanced practice registered nurse, and (iii) be licensed as an advanced practice registered nurse.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2026, the preferred representation of the advanced practice registered nurses on the board includes one certified registered nurse anesthetist, one nurse practitioner, one clinical nurse specialist, and one certified nurse midwife. If such representation is not possible, any vacancy under subdivision (2)(f) of section 38-2213 may be filled based on the composition of the applicant pool for the vacant advanced practice registered nurse position on the board.

(c) The appointment of advanced practice registered nurses to fill the vacancies as of July 1, 2026, shall be made so that one of the four advanced practice registered nurse members serves until December 1, 2028, one serves until December 1, 2029, one serves until December 1, 2030, and one serves until December 1, 2031, or as close thereto as possible. Subsequent appointments of advanced practice registered nurses shall be for five-year terms as provided in section 38-163.

Laws 1953, c. 245, § 4(2), p. 838;

Laws 1955, c. 272, § 4, p. 857;

Laws 1975, LB 422, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 38;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 16;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 12;

Laws 1996, LB 414, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 16;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 26;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,132.08;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 770;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 17.

The Board of Nursing has power to deny a license upon proof applicant is guilty of unprofessional conduct, and upon review de novo district court may not substitute its own judgment on that issue. Scott v. State ex rel. Board of Nursing, 196 Neb. 681, 244 N.W.2d 683 (1976).